src/kal-lex.txt
LEXICON Z1Zmorf	!derivationsmorfemer til nominer
	tp ;
+ALUK+nn:%>%TRUNCaluk	tup- ;
+ALUK=ARAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluaraq	Z1+qaZ ;
+ALUK=ARAQ=KASIK+nn:%>%TRUNCaluarakasik	tup- ;
+ALUK=ARAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluarannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=ARAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluararsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=ARAQ=USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluaraasaq	tp ;
+ALUK=ARAQ=USAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluaraasannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluinnaq	tup- ;
+ALUK=INNAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluinnannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=INNAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluinnarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=INNAQ=VIK+nn:%>%TRUNCaluinnavik	tup- ;
+ALUK=INNAQ=VIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluinnavissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=KUQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalukoq	tp ;
+ALUK=LIK+nn:%>%TRUNCalu	Z2+lZ ;
+ALUK=LIK=RUJUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalulerujussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=LIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalulissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=LIK=TAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalulittaq	tp ;
+ALUK=MINIQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalumineq	Z2+rZmorf ;
+ALUK=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalunnguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=NNGUAQ=ARAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalunnguaaraq	Z1+qaZ ;
+ALUK=NNGUAQ=INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalunnguaannaq	tup- ;
+ALUK=NNGUAQ=KULUK+nn:%>%TRUNCalunnguakkuluk	tup- ;
+ALUK=PAK+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpak	Z2-PZ ;
+ALUK=PAK=ALUK+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpaaluk	Z2-PZ ;
+ALUK=PAK=ALUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpaalussuaq	Z2aqPZ ;
+ALUK=PAK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpassuaq	Z2aqPZ ;
+ALUK=PALLAK+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpallak	tup- ;
+ALUK=PALLAK=SSUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpallassuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=PALAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalupalaaq	tp ;
+ALUK=PALAAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalupalaannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=PALAAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalupalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=PALUK+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpaluk	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=PALUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpalussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=PIAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpiaq	tp ;
+ALUK=PIAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorpiannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=PILUK+nn:%>%TRUNCalupiluk	tup- ;
+ALUK=PILUK=LIK+nn:%>%TRUNCalupilu	Z2+lZ ;
+ALUK=PILUK=LIK=RUJUK+nn:%>%TRUNCalupilulerujuk	tup- ;
+ALUK=PILUK=LIK=RUJUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalupilulerujussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=PILUK=LIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalupilulissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=PILUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalupilussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=RALAANNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaloralaannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=RUJUK+nn:%>%TRUNCalorujuk	tup- ;
+ALUK=RUJUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorujussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=SSAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalussaq	tp ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=GALUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalussaraluaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalussaannaq	tup- ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=LIK+nn:%>%TRUNCalussa	Z2+lZ ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=MINIQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalussamineq	Z2+rZ ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=SIAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalussarsiaq	tp ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=SIAQ=KKAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalussarsiakkaaq	tp ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=SIAQ=SSAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalussarsiassaq	tp ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalussarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=TUAQ+vv:%>%TRUNCalussatuaq	tp ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=TUAQ=NNGUAQ+vv:%>%TRUNCalussatuannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=SSAQ=TSIALAK+nn:%>%TRUNCalussatsialak	tup- ;
+ALUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=SUAQ=ARAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorsuaaraq	Z1+qaZ ;
+ALUK=SUAQ=ARAQ=KASIK+nn:%>%TRUNCalorsuaarakasik	tup- ;
+ALUK=SUAQ=KKUT+nn:%>%TRUNCalorsuakkut	ZkkutZ ;
+ALUK=SUAQ=USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorsuaasaq	tp ;
+ALUK=SUAQ=USAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorsuaasaaq	tp ;
+ALUK=SUAQ=USAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorsuaasarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=SUAQ=USAAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalorsuaarsaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ALUK=SUNNI+nn:%>%TRUNCalusunni	tp ;
+ALUK=TSIALAK+nn:%>%TRUNCalutsialak	tup- ;
+ALUK=TUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalutuaq	tp ;
+ALUK=TUAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCalutuannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluusaq	tp ;
+ALUK=USAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluusannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK=USAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluusaaq	tp ;
+ALUK=VIK+nn:%>%TRUNCaluvik	tup- ;
+ALUK=VIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaluvissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ARAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaraq	Z1+qaZ ;
+ARAQ=KASIK+nn:%>%TRUNCarakasik	tup- ;
+ARAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCarannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ARAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCararsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+ARAQ=USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaraasaq	tp ;
+ARAQ=USAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCaraasannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+GALUAQ+nn:%>galuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+GIIT+nn:%>%TRUNCgiit	ZkkutZ ;
+INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCinnaq	tup- ;
+INNAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCinnannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+INNAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCinnarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+INNAQ=VIK+nn:%>%TRUNCinnavik	tup- ;
+INNAQ=VIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCinnavissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KAJAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkajaaq	tp ;
+KAJAAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkajaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KASIK+nn:%>%TRUNCkasik	tup- ;
+KKAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkkaaq	tp ;
+KKUT+nn:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZkkutZ ;
+KUJUUQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujooq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=ARAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuaraq	Z1+qaZ ;
+KUJUUQ=ARAQ=KASIK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuarakasik	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=ARAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuarannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=ARAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuararsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=ARAQ=USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuaraasaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=ARAQ=USAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuaraasannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=GALUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuugaluaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuinnaq	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=INNAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuinnannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=INNAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuinnarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=INNAQ=VIK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuinnavik	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=INNAQ=VIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuinnavissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=KASIK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuukasik	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=KULLAK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuukullak	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=KULLAK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuukullassuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=LIAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuliaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=LIAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuliannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=LIK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuu	Z2+lZ ;
+KUJUUQ=LIK=RUJUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuulerujussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=LIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuulissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=MINIQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuumineq	Z2+rZ ;
+KUJUUQ=MINIQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuumininnguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=MINIQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuumersuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuunnguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=NNGUAQ=KULUK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuunnguakkuluk	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=NNGUAQ=INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuunnguaannaq	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=PALAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuupalaaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=PALAAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuupalaannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=PALAAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuupalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=PIAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorpiaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=PIAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorpiannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=PILUK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuupiluk	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=PILUK=LIK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuupilu	Z2+lZ ;
+KUJUUQ=PILUK=LIK=RUJUK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuupilulerujuk	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=PILUK=LIK=RUJUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuupilulerujussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=PILUK=LIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuupilulissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=PILUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuupilussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=RALAANNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujooralaannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=RUJUK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorujuk	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=RUJUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorujussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=GALUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussaraluaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussaannaq	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=LIK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussa	Z2+lZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=MINIQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussamineq	Z2+rZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=SIAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussarsiaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=SIAQ=KKAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussarsiakkaaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=SIAQ=SSAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussarsiassaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=TUAQ+vv:%>%TRUNCkujuussatuaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=TUAQ=NNGUAQ+vv:%>%TRUNCkujuussatuannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SSAQ=TSIALAK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuussatsialak	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SUAQ=ARAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorsuaaraq	Z1+qaZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SUAQ=ARAQ=KASIK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorsuaarakasik	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=SUAQ=KKUT+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorsuakkut	ZkkutZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SUAQ=USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorsuaasaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=SUAQ=USAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorsuaasaaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=SUAQ=USAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorsuaasarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=SUAQ=USAAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujoorsuaarsaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=TSIALAK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuutsialak	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=TUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuutuaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=TUAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuutuannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuusaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuujusaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=USAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuusannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=USAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuujusannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ=USAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuusaaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=USAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuujusaaq	tp ;
+KUJUUQ=VIK+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuvik	tup- ;
+KUJUUQ=VIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkujuuvissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KULLAK+nn:%>%TRUNCkullak	tup- ;
+KULLAK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkullassuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+KUQ+nn:%>%TRUNCkoq	tp ;
+LAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNClaaq	tp ;
+LIAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCliaq	tp ;
+LIAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCliannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+LIK+nn:%>%TRUNC	Z2+lZ ;
+LIK=RUJUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNClerujussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+LIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNClissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+LIK=TAQ+nn:%>%TRUNClittaq	tp ;
+LUINNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrluinnaq	tup- ;
+MINIQ+nn:%>%TRUNCmineq	Z2+rZmorf ;
+MIUQ+nn:%>mioq	tp ;
+MIUQ=QATE+nn:%>mioqat	tpt ;
+MIU+nn:%>miu	tp ;
+NGAJAK+nn:%>%TRUNCngajak	tup- ;
+NGAJAK=VIK+nn:%>%TRUNCngajavik	tup- ;
+NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+NNGUAQ=KULUK+nn:%>%TRUNCnnguakkuluk	tup- ;
+NNGUAQ=INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCnnguaannaq	tup- ;
+PAK+nn:%>%TRUNCrpak	Z2-PZ ;
+PAK=ALUK+nn:%>%TRUNCrpaaluk	Z2-PZ ;
+PAK=ALUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrpaalussuaq	Z2aqPZ ;
+PAK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrpassuaq	Z2aqPZ ;
+PALLAK+nn:%>%TRUNCrpallak	tup- ;
+PALLAK=SSUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrpallassuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+PALAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCpalaaq	tp ;
+PALAAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCpalaannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+PALAAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCpalaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+PALUK+nn:%>%TRUNCrpaluk	Z2aqZ ;
+PALUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrpalussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+PIAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrpiaq	tp ;
+PIAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrpiannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+PILUK+nn:%>%TRUNCpiluk	tup- ;
+PILUK=LIK+nn:%>%TRUNCpilu	Z2+lZ ;
+PILUK=LIK=RUJUK+nn:%>%TRUNCpilulerujuk	tup- ;
+PILUK=LIK=RUJUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCpilulerujussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+PILUK=LIK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCpilulissuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+PILUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCpilussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+QATE+nn:%>%TRUNCqat	tpt ;
+QATE=GIIT+nn:%>%TRUNCqatigiit	ZkkutZ ;
+RALAANNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCralaannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+RUJUK+nn:%>%TRUNCrujuk	tup- ;
+RUJUK=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrujussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+SIAQ+nn:%>siaq	tp ;
+SIAQ=INNAQ+nn:%>siaannaq	tup- ;
+SIAQ=INNAQ=MINIQ+nn:%>siaannamineq	Z2+rZmorf ;
+SIAQ=INNAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>siaannannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+SIAQ=SSAQ+nn:%>siassaq	tp ;
+SIAQ=SSAQ=GALUAQ+nn:%>siassaraluaq	Z2aqZ ;
+SIAQ=SSAQ=MINIQ+nn:%>siassamineq	Z2+rZmorf ;
+SIAQ=SSAQ=SIAQ+nn:%>siassarsiaq	tp ;
+SIUT+nn:%>siut	tpt ;
+SIUT=LIK+nn:%>siuti	Z2+lZ ;
+SIUT=PAK=SUAQ+nn:%>siuterpassuaq	Z2aqPZ ;
+SIUT=SSAQ+nn:%>siutissaq	tp ;
+SSAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCssaq	tp ;
+SSAQ=GALUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCssaraluaq	Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ=INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCssaannaq	tup- ;
+SSAQ=LIK+nn:%>%TRUNCssa	Z2+lZ ;
+SSAQ=MINIQ+nn:%>%TRUNCssamineq	Z2+rZmorf ;
+SSAQ=SIAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCssarsiaq	tp ;
+SSAQ=SIAQ=KKAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCssarsiakkaaq	tp ;
+SSAQ=SIAQ=SSAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCssarsiassaq	tp ;
+SSAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCssarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ=TUAQ+vv:%>%TRUNCssatuaq	tp ;
+SSAQ=TUAQ=NNGUAQ+vv:%>%TRUNCssatuannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+SSAQ=TSIALAK+nn:%>%TRUNCssatsialak	tup- ;
+SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ=ARAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaaraq	Z1+qaZ ;
+SUAQ=ARAQ=KASIK+nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaarakasik	tup- ;
+SUAQ=KKUT+nn:%>%TRUNCrsuakkut	ZkkutZ ;
+SUAQ=USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaasaq	tp ;
+SUAQ=USAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaasaaq	tp ;
+SUAQ=USAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaasarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ=USAAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCrsuaarsaarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+SUNNI+nn:%>sunni	tp ;
+TAAQ+nn:%>taaq	tp ;
+TAQ+nn:%>taq	tp ;
+TAQ=LIK+nn:%>ta	Z2+lZ ;
+TAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>tannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TAQ=TUAQ+nn:%>tatuaq	tp ;
+TSIALAK+nn:%>%TRUNCtsialak	tup- ;
+TUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCtuaq	tp ;
+TUAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCtuannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TUGAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCtugaq	Z1+kaZ ;
+TUQAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCtoqaq	Z1+qaZ ;
+TUQAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCtoqarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+USAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCusaq	tp ;
+USAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCusannguaq	Z1nnguaqZ ;
+USAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCusaaq	tp ;
+UTE+nn:%>%TRUNCut	tpt ;
+UTE=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCussuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+UTE=SSAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutissaq	tp ;
+UTE=TAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitaaq	tp ;
+UTE=TUQAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqaq Z1+qaZ ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=PALAAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqapalaaq	tp ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=RUJUK+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqarujuk	tup- ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassaq	tp ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ=GALUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassaraluaq	Z2aqZ ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ=INNAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassaannaq	tup- ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ=LIK+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassa	Z2+lZ ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ=MINIQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassamineq	Z2+rZmorf ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ=SIAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassarsiaq	tp ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ=SIAQ=SSAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassarsiassaq	tp ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ=SUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassarsuaq	Z2aqZ ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ=TUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassatuaq	tp ;
+UTE=TUQAQ=SSAQ=TUAQ=NNGUAQ+nn:%>%TRUNCutitoqassatuannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
